Utah statutes.
19-6-818.   Local health department rules.

(1)  In accordance with Section 26A-1-121, the local health department shall make regulations to:

(a)  develop an application form; and

(b)  establish the procedure to apply for reimbursement.

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission shall make rules to implement this part.

(3)  The local health departments shall take into consideration the removal schedule of tire transporters or recyclers in a geographical area when making regulations governing the storage of waste tires at any business that generates waste tires, pending removal of those waste tires for recycling.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

